Wisconsin, session 2025, AB867.
do enact as follows:AB867,13Section 1. 196.376 of the statutes is created to read:AB867,2,34196.376 Residential energy improvement program. The commission 5shall establish and implement a program under which a public utility may finance 6energy improvements at a specific dwelling and recover the cost of those 1improvements over time through a surcharge periodically placed on the public 2utility’s customer account for that dwelling. The commission shall promulgate 3rules to implement this program.AB867,2,44